Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 10 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE
§ 56-1012. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code:

“Advanced emergency medical technician” means a person who has met the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, is licensed by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, carries out the practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the commission and practices under the supervision of an Idaho licensed physician.

“Agency” means any organization licensed by the EMS bureau that operates an air medical service, ambulance service or nontransport service.

“Air ambulance” means any privately or publicly owned fixed wing aircraft or rotary wing aircraft used for, or intended to be used for, the transportation of persons experiencing physiological or psychological illness or injury who may need medical attention during transport. This may include dual or multipurpose vehicles which otherwise comply with sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, and specifications established by board rule.

“Air medical service” means an agency licensed by the EMS bureau that responds to requests for patient care and transportation from hospitals and EMS agencies using a fixed wing aircraft or rotary wing aircraft.

“Ambulance” means any privately or publicly owned motor vehicle or nautical vessel used for, or intended to be used for, the transportation of sick or injured persons who may need medical attention during transport. This may include dual or multipurpose vehicles which otherwise comply with sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, and specifications established by board rule.

“Ambulance service” means an agency licensed by the EMS bureau operated with the intent to provide personnel and equipment for medical treatment at an emergency scene, during transportation or during transfer of persons experiencing physiological or psychological illness or injury who may need medical attention during transport.

“Applicant” means any organization that is requesting an agency license under this chapter and includes the following:

An organization seeking a new license;

An existing agency that intends to change the level of licensed personnel it utilizes;

An existing agency that intends to change its geographic coverage area, except by agency annexation;

An existing nontransport service that intends to provide ambulance service;

An existing ambulance service that intends to discontinue transport and become a nontransport service.

“Board” means the Idaho board of health and welfare.

“Commission” means the Idaho emergency medical services physician commission.

“Community emergency medical technician” or “community EMT” means an emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician with additional standardized training who works within a designated community health emergency medical services program under local medical control as part of a community-based team of health and social services providers.

“Community health emergency medical services” or “community health EMS” means the evaluation, advice or treatment of an eligible recipient outside of a hospital setting, which is specifically requested for the purpose of preventing or improving a particular medical condition, and which is provided by a licensed emergency medical services agency. Community health EMS involving or related to emergency response must be provided by or in coordination with the primary 911 response agency for that area.
(12) “Community paramedic” means a paramedic with additional standardized training who works within a designated community health emergency medical services program under local medical control as part of a community-based team of health and social services providers.

Respond to a perceived need for medical care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury;

Are prepared to provide interventions that are within the scope of practice as defined by the commission;

Use an alerting mechanism to initiate a response to requests for medical care; and

Offer, advertise or attempt to respond as described in paragraphs (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(13) “Department” means the Idaho department of health and welfare.

(14) “Eligible recipient” means an individual eligible to receive community health emergency medical services, as determined by rule of the EMS bureau or a local community health emergency medical services program.

(15) “Emergency medical responder” means a person who has met the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, is licensed by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, carries out the practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the commission and practices under the supervision of an Idaho licensed physician.

(16) “Emergency medical services” or “EMS” means aid rendered by an individual or group of individuals who do the following:

(17) “EMS bureau” means the bureau of emergency medical services of the department.

(18) “Emergency medical technician” means a person who has met the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, is licensed by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, carries out the practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the commission and practices under the supervision of an Idaho licensed physician.

(19) “Licensed personnel” means those individuals who are emergency medical responders, emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics.

(20) “National emergency medical services information system technical assistance center” means an organization that validates software for compliance with the EMS data set defined by the United States department of transportation national highway traffic safety administration.

(21) “Nontransport service” means an agency licensed by the EMS bureau, operated with the intent to provide personnel or equipment for medical stabilization at an emergency scene, but not intended to be the service that will actually transport sick or injured persons.

(22) “Nontransport vehicle” means any vehicle operated by an agency with the intent to provide personnel or equipment for medical stabilization at an emergency scene, but not intended as the vehicle that will actually transport sick or injured persons.

(23) “Paramedic” means a person who has met the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, is licensed by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, carries out the practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the commission and practices under the supervision of an Idaho licensed physician.
(24) “Supervision” means the medical direction by a licensed physician of activities provided by licensed personnel affiliated with a licensed ambulance, air medical or nontransport service, including, but not limited to: establishing standing orders and protocols, reviewing performance of licensed personnel, providing instructions for patient care via radio or telephone, and other oversight.

(25) “Transfer” means the transportation of a patient from one (1) medical care facility to another.

§ 56-1013. Authorized actions.

Persons licensed by the EMS bureau shall be authorized to perform such acts under written or oral authorization of a licensed physician as shall be established by rules of the commission, including, but not limited to, administration of intravenous solutions and drugs, cardiac defibrillation, airway management, endotracheal intubation, community health emergency medical services and other patient care.

§ 56-1013A. Idaho emergency medical services physician commission — Terms and operation.

There is hereby created in the department an Idaho emergency medical services physician commission for the purpose of establishing standards for scope of practice and medical supervision for licensed personnel and agencies licensed by the EMS bureau, and for making disciplinary action recommendations to the EMS bureau against licensed personnel. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commission shall exercise its powers and duties in accordance with the provisions of sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, relative to scope of practice and medical supervision of licensed personnel.

The commission shall be composed of eleven (11) voting members appointed by the governor upon assurance of equitable geographic and rural representation. Six (6) members shall be physicians currently licensed in Idaho and appointed as follows: one (1) member representing the Idaho board of medicine as provided in chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, one (1) member representing the Idaho medical association, one (1) member representing the EMS bureau, one (1) member representing the Idaho chapter of the American college of emergency physicians, one (1) member representing the Idaho chapter of the American academy of pediatrics and one (1) member representing the Idaho chapter of the American college of surgeons committee on trauma. Three (3) members shall be physicians currently licensed in Idaho and practicing as an EMS medical director representing the following associations: one (1) member representing the Idaho association of counties, one (1) member representing the Idaho fire chiefs association and one (1) member representing the Idaho hospital association. Two (2) members shall be Idaho citizens representing the public interest.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of the commission shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. The following four (4) members shall be appointed to an initial term of two (2) years: the member representing the board of medicine, the member representing the Idaho chapter of the American college of emergency physicians, the member representing the Idaho chapter of the American college of surgeons committee on trauma and the member representing the Idaho fire chiefs association. The remaining seven (7) members shall be appointed for an initial term of three (3) years. Thereafter, all terms shall be for a period of three (3) years.

The commission shall elect a chair and such officers as it may deem necessary and appropriate. The commission shall meet at least annually and at the call of the chair. Members of the commission shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.

Prior to the expiration of the regular term of a member of the commission or upon the occurrence or declaration of a vacancy in the membership of the commission, the EMS bureau shall notify the represented entity of that fact in writing and the represented entity shall, within sixty (60) days thereafter, nominate at least three (3) persons to fill the vacancy in a manner as shall be determined by the rules and bylaws of the represented entity and shall forward the nominations to the governor, who shall appoint from among the nominees a person to be a member of the commission to fill the vacancy. Persons nominated for a seat held by a physician must be licensed by the state of Idaho to practice medicine.

Moneys collected pursuant to rules promulgated by the board for initial applications and renewal of EMS personnel licenses are hereby continuously appropriated and shall be utilized exclusively for the purposes set forth in this section as determined by the commission.

The commission shall prepare a budget on an annual basis indicating that portion of the funds necessary for the continuous operation of the commission to achieve the purposes of this section.

§ 56-1013B. Recognition of EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact (REPLICA).

The recognition of EMS personnel licensure interstate compact (REPLICA) is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows in sections 56-1013C through 56-1013Q, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1013C. Purpose.

In order to protect the public through verification of competency and ensure accountability for patient care related activities all states license emergency medical services (EMS) personnel, such as emergency medical technicians (EMTs), advanced EMTs and paramedics. This compact is intended to facilitate the day-to-day movement of EMS personnel across state boundaries in the performance of their EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate authority and authorize state EMS offices to afford immediate legal recognition to EMS personnel licensed in a member state. This compact recognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting the public’s health and safety through their licensing and regulation of EMS personnel and that such state regulation shared among the member states will best protect public health and safety. This compact is designed to achieve the following purposes and objectives:

Increase public access to EMS personnel;

Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety, especially patient safety;

Encourage the cooperation of member states in the areas of EMS personnel licensure and regulation;

Support licensing of military members who are separating from an active duty tour and their spouses;

Facilitate the exchange of information between member states regarding EMS personnel licensure, adverse action and significant investigatory information;

Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel practice in each member state; and

Invest all member states with the authority to hold EMS personnel accountable through the mutual recognition of member state licenses.

§ 56-1013D. Definitions.

As used in this compact:

“Advanced emergency medical technician” (AEMT) means an individual licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model.

“Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws that may be imposed against licensed EMS personnel by a state EMS authority or state court including, but not limited to, actions against an individual’s license such as revocation, suspension, probation, consent agreement, monitoring or other limitation or encumbrance on the individual’s practice, letters of reprimand or admonition, fines, criminal convictions and state court judgments enforcing adverse actions by the state EMS authority.

“Alternative program” means a voluntary, nondisciplinary substance abuse recovery program approved by a state EMS authority.

“Certification” means the successful verification of entry-level cognitive and psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated and legally defensible examination.

“Commission” means the national administrative body of which all states that have enacted the compact are members.

“Emergency medical technician” (EMT) means an individual licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model.

“Home state” means a member state where an individual is licensed to practice emergency medical services.

“License” means the authorization by a state for an individual to practice as an EMT, AEMT, paramedic or a level in between EMT and paramedic.

“Medical director” means a physician licensed in a member state who is accountable for the care delivered by EMS personnel.

“Member state” means a state that has enacted this compact.

“Privilege to practice” means an individual’s authority to deliver emergency medical services in remote states as authorized under this compact.

“Paramedic” means an individual licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of practice model.

“Remote state” means a member state in which an individual is not licensed.

“Restricted” means the outcome of an adverse action that limits a license or the privilege to practice.

“Rule” means a written statement by the commission promulgated pursuant to section 56-1013N, Idaho Code, of this compact that is of general applicability; implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of the compact; or is an organizational, procedural or practice requirement of the commission and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state and includes the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule.

“Scope of practice” means defined parameters of various duties or services that may be provided by an individual with specific credentials. Whether regulated by rule, statute or court decision, it tends to represent the limits of services an individual may perform.

“Significant investigatory information” means:
(a) Investigative information that a state EMS authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to respond if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proved true, would result in the imposition of an adverse action on a license or privilege to practice; or

“State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States.

“State EMS authority” means the board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel.

(b) Investigative information that indicates that the individual represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the individual has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.

§ 56-1013E. Home state licensure.

Any member state in which an individual holds a current license shall be deemed a home state for purposes of this compact.

Any member state may require an individual to obtain and retain a license to be authorized to practice in the member state under circumstances not authorized by the privilege to practice under the terms of this compact.

A home state’s license authorizes an individual to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice only if the home state:

Currently requires the use of the national registry of emergency medical technicians (NREMT) examination as a condition of issuing initial licenses at the EMT and paramedic levels;

Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about individuals;

Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding an individual;

No later than five (5) years after activation of the compact, requires a criminal background check of all applicants for initial licensure, including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the federal bureau of investigation with the exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in accordance with 5 CFR 731.202 and submit documentation of such as promulgated in the rules of the commission; and

Complies with the rules of the commission.

§ 56-1013F. Compact privilege to practice.

Member states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an individual licensed in another member state that is in conformance with section 56-1013E, Idaho Code.

To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and provisions of this compact, an individual must:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Possess a current unrestricted license in a member state as an EMT, AEMT, paramedic or state recognized and licensed level with a scope of practice and authority between EMT and paramedic; and

Practice under the supervision of a medical director.

An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the privilege to practice shall function within the scope of practice authorized by the home state unless and until modified by an appropriate authority in the remote state as may be defined in the rules of the commission.

Except as provided in this section, an individual practicing in a remote state will be subject to the remote state’s authority and laws. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state’s laws, restrict, suspend or revoke an individual’s privilege to practice in the remote state and may take any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. If a remote state takes action it shall promptly notify the home state and the commission.

If an individual’s license in any home state is restricted or suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice until the individual’s home state license is restored.

If an individual’s privilege to practice in any remote state is restricted, suspended or revoked, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in any remote state until the individual’s privilege to practice is restored.

§ 56-1013G. Conditions of practice in a remote state.

An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to practice only in the performance of the individual’s EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under the following circumstances:

The individual originates a patient transport in a home state and transports the patient to a remote state;

The individual originates in the home state and enters a remote state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport of the patient to the home state;

The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care and/or transport within that remote state;

The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport to a third member state;

Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the commission.

§ 56-1013H. Relationship to Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

Upon a member state’s governor’s declaration of a state of emergency or disaster that activates the emergency management assistance compact (EMAC), all relevant terms and provisions of EMAC shall apply and to the extent any terms or provisions of this compact conflict with EMAC, the terms of EMAC shall prevail with respect to any individual practicing in the remote state in response to such declaration.

§ 56-1013I. Veterans, service members separating from active duty military and their spouses.

Member states shall consider a veteran, active military service member, and member of the national guard and reserves separating from an active duty tour, and a spouse thereof, who holds a current valid and unrestricted NREMT certification at or above the level of the state license being sought as satisfying the minimum training and examination requirements for such licensure.

Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure applications submitted by veterans, active military service members, and members of the national guard and reserves separating from an active duty tour, and their spouses.

All individuals functioning with a privilege to practice under this section remain subject to the adverse actions provisions of section 56-1013J, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1013J. Adverse actions.

A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action against an individual’s license issued by the home state.

If an individual’s license in any home state is restricted or suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state under the privilege to practice until the individual’s home state license is restored.

All home state adverse action orders shall include a statement that the individual’s compact privileges are inactive. The order may allow the individual to practice in remote states with prior written authorization from both the home state and remote state’s EMS authority.

An individual currently subject to adverse action in the home state shall not practice in any remote state without prior written authorization from both the home state and remote state’s EMS authority.

A member state shall report adverse actions and any occurrences that the individual’s compact privileges are restricted, suspended or revoked to the commission in accordance with the rules of the commission.

A remote state may take adverse action on an individual’s privilege to practice within that state.

Any member state may take adverse action against an individual’s privilege to practice in that state based on the factual findings of another member state, so long as each state follows its own procedures for imposing such adverse action.

A home state’s EMS authority shall investigate and take appropriate action with respect to reported conduct in a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In such cases, the home state’s law shall control in determining the appropriate adverse action.

Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the member state’s laws. Member states must require individuals who enter any alternative programs to agree not to practice in any other member state during the term of the alternative program without prior authorization from such other member state.

§ 56-1013K. Additional powers invested in a member state’s EMS authority.

A member state’s EMS authority, in addition to any other powers granted under state law, is authorized under this compact to:

Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a member state’s EMS authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and/or the production of evidence from another member state, shall be enforced in the remote state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to that court’s practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing state EMS authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses and/or evidence are located; and

Issue cease and desist orders to restrict, suspend or revoke an individual’s privilege to practice in the state.

§ 56-1013L. Establishment of the interstate commission for EMS personnel practice.

The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the interstate commission for EMS personnel practice.

The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the compact states.

Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Membership, voting, and meetings.

Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate. The responsible official of the state EMS authority or his designee shall be the delegate to this compact for each member state. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the member state in which the vacancy exists. In the event that more than one (1) board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel at and above the level of EMT exists, the governor of the state will determine which entity will be responsible for assigning the delegate.

Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.

The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.

All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 56-1013N, Idaho Code.

The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact; the employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures; current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation; negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate; accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes; disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute.

If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3) The commission shall, by a majority vote of the delegates, prescribe bylaws and/or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of the compact including, but not limited to:

Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of the compact after the payment and/or reserving of all of its debts and obligations;

The commission shall publish its bylaws and file a copy thereof, and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the member states, if any;

The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws; and

The commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws.

To establish a budget and make expenditures;

To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws;

To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;

To adopt and use an official seal; and

To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of EMS personnel licensure and practice.

(a) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission;

(b) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment and meetings of other committees; and governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission;

(c) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings, and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public’s interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the membership votes to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each member with no proxy votes allowed;

(d) Establishing the titles, duties and authority, and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission;

(e) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any member state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission;

(f) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited activities of commission members and employees;

(4) The commission shall have the following powers:

(a) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states;

(b) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any state EMS authority or other regulatory body responsible for EMS personnel licensure to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;

(c) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

(d) To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;

(e) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and to establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;

(f) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;

(g) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety;

(h) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed;

(j) To borrow money;

(5) Financing of the commission.

(a) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

(b) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.

(c) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

(d) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

(e) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.

(6) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(a) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.

(b) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.

(c) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.